Illinois, session 104th, HB4063.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sports Wagering Act is amended by changing 5Section 25-25 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 45/25-25)7    Sec. 25-25. Sports wagering authorized.8    (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 9the operation of sports wagering is only lawful when conducted 10in accordance with the provisions of this Act and the rules of 11the Illinois Gaming Board and the Department of the Lottery.12    (b) A person placing a wager under this Act shall be at 13least 21 years of age.14    (c) A licensee under this Act may not accept a wager on a 15minor league sports event.16    (d) (Blank). Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 17a licensee under this Act may not accept a wager for a sports 18event involving an Illinois collegiate team.19    (d-5) (Blank). Beginning on the effective date of this 20amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly until July 1, 212024, a licensee under this Act may accept a wager for a sports 22event involving an Illinois collegiate team if:23        (1) the wager is a tier 1 wager;  HB4063- 2 -LRB104 13778 AAS 26543 b1        (2) the wager is not related to an individual 2    athlete's performance; and3        (3) the wager is made in person instead of over the 4    Internet or through a mobile application. 5    (e) A licensee under this Act may only accept a wager from 6a person physically located in the State.7    (f) Master sports wagering licensees may use any data 8source for determining the results of all tier 1 sports 9wagers.10    (g) A sports governing body headquartered in the United 11States may notify the Board that it desires to supply official 12league data to master sports wagering licensees for 13determining the results of tier 2 sports wagers. Such 14notification shall be made in the form and manner as the Board 15may require. If a sports governing body does not notify the 16Board of its desire to supply official league data, a master 17sports wagering licensee may use any data source for 18determining the results of any and all tier 2 sports wagers on 19sports contests for that sports governing body.20    Within 30 days of a sports governing body notifying the 21Board, master sports wagering licensees shall use only 22official league data to determine the results of tier 2 sports 23wagers on sports events sanctioned by that sports governing 24body, unless: (1) the sports governing body or designee cannot 25provide a feed of official league data to determine the 26results of a particular type of tier 2 sports wager, in which   HB4063- 3 -LRB104 13778 AAS 26543 b1case master sports wagering licensees may use any data source 2for determining the results of the applicable tier 2 sports 3wager until such time as such data feed becomes available on 4commercially reasonable terms; or (2) a master sports wagering 5licensee can demonstrate to the Board that the sports 6governing body or its designee cannot provide a feed of 7official league data to the master sports wagering licensee on 8commercially reasonable terms. During the pendency of the 9Board's determination, such master sports wagering licensee 10may use any data source for determining the results of any and 11all tier 2 sports wagers. 12    (h) A licensee under this Act may not accept wagers on a 13kindergarten through 12th grade sports event.14(Source: P.A. 102-689, eff. 12-17-21; 103-4, eff. 5-31-23.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.